Idaho statutes. Title 22 AGRICULTURE AND HORTICULTURE
Chapter 34 PESTICIDES AND CHEMIGATION
§ 22-3420. Prohibited acts.

No person shall:

Use a pesticide in a manner inconsistent with its labeling except as provided for by rule.

Make pesticide recommendations in a manner inconsistent with its labeling except as provided for by rule.

Make false or misleading claims through any media relating to the effect of pesticides or application methods to be utilized.

Operate a faulty or unsafe pesticide spray apparatus, aircraft, or other application device or equipment.

Operate a faulty or unsafe chemigation system.

Apply ineffective or improper pesticides.

Make false, misleading or fraudulent records, reports or application forms required by the provisions of this act.

Apply pesticides in a faulty, careless, or negligent manner.

Refuse or neglect to keep and maintain records required by the provisions of this act, or to make reports when and as often as required.

Distribute, sell or offer for sale any pesticide or device which is misbranded.

Formulate, distribute, sell or offer for sale any pesticide which is adulterated.

Distribute, sell or offer for sale any pesticide except in the manufacturer’s original unbroken container.

Refuse or neglect to comply with any limitations or restrictions placed on a license or permit issued under the provisions of this act.

Refuse or neglect to comply with any other provisions of this act or rule, or any lawful order of the director.

Aid or abet a licensed or an unlicensed person to evade the provisions of this act, conspire with such licensed or an unlicensed person to evade the provisions of this act, or allow one’s license or permit to be used by another person.

Make false or misleading statements during or after an inspection concerning any infestation or infection of pests found on land.

Impersonate any federal, state, county or city inspector or official.

Use or supervise the use of any restricted-use pesticide, or any state restricted-use pesticide without having complied with the licensing requirements pursuant to this act, and such other restrictions as had been determined by the director as necessary to prevent unreasonable adverse effects on the environment, including injury to the applicator, persons, or land, provided, that a person who is not a certified applicator but an employee of a licensed private applicator may use a restricted-use pesticide or a state restricted-use pesticide under the direct supervision of the licensed private applicator unless otherwise prescribed by the labeling of the pesticide.

Use or supervise the use of a chemical in a chemigation system without having complied with the licensing requirements pursuant to this act and rules, and such other restrictions as have been determined by the director. A person who is not a certified applicator but an employee of a licensed private applicator may use chemicals under the direct supervision of a licensed private applicator unless otherwise prescribed by the labeling of the chemical.

Chemigate without installing the proper chemigation equipment to protect against surface or ground water contamination.
(21) Fail to abide by the conditions of a stop sale, use or removal order, or chemigation stop work order.

(22) Offer for sale, hold for sale, sell, barter, ship, deliver for shipment, or receive and, having so received, deliver or offer to deliver, chemicals for chemigation to an unlicensed person.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-3420, as added by 1976, ch. 190, § 2, p. 688; am. 1993, ch. 54, § 5, p. 142; am. 1996, ch. 22, § 13, p. 41; am. 1999, ch. 69, § 13, p. 180.

§ 22-3421. Adoption and scope of rules.

The director is authorized to adopt appropriate rules for carrying out the purpose and provisions of this act including, but not limited to, rules providing for:

The collection and examination of samples of pesticides or devices; and

the safe handling, transportation, storage, display, distribution and disposal of pesticides and their containers; and

procedures in making pesticide recommendations; and

procedures for obtaining permits; and

regulating the labeling of devices; and

procedures to take possession and dispose of canceled, suspended, or otherwise unusable pesticides held by persons. For the purpose of this section, the department may become a hazardous waste generator, and may set fees to partially offset an agricultural chemical waste disposal program’s cost; and

antipollution devices, chemigation equipment requirements, performance standards and installation requirements; and

listing of the sites where chemigation will be conducted by the applicator.

Such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-3421, as added by 1976, ch. 190, § 2, p. 688; am. 1992, ch. 43, § 2, p. 143; am. 1996, ch. 22, § 14, p. 41; am. 1999, ch. 69, § 14, p. 180.

§ 22-3422. Penalties for operating without license.

Any person operating as a professional or private applicator or dealer without a license shall forfeit to the state for each day’s operation one hundred dollars ($100) as a civil penalty and such operation may be enjoined upon complaint of the director.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-3422, as added by 1976, ch. 190, § 2, p. 688; am. 1996, ch. 22, § 15, p. 41.

§ 22-3423. Penalty for violations.

Any person who shall forge, alter, counterfeit, simulate or falsely represent, or who shall without proper authority use any license issued by the director under this act, or who shall violate or fail to comply with any provisions of this act shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned in the county jail for not less than three (3) months nor more than twelve (12) months or be subject to both such fine and imprisonment.

Any person who violates or fails to comply with any provision of this act or any rules promulgated under this act may be assessed a civil penalty by the department or its duly authorized agent of not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000) for each offense and shall be liable for reasonable attorney fees. Assessment of a civil penalty may be made in conjunction with any other department administrative action. No civil penalty may be assessed unless the person charged was given notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to the Idaho administrative procedure act. If the department is unable to collect such penalty or if any person fails to pay all or a set portion of the civil penalty as determined by the department, it may recover such amount by action in the appropriate district court. Any person against whom the department has assessed a civil penalty under this section may, within thirty (30) days of the final agency action making the assessment, appeal the assessment to the district court of the county in which the violation is alleged by the department to have occurred. Moneys collected for violation of a rule shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the pesticide account of the department.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the director to report minor violations for prosecution when he believes that the public interests will be best served by suitable warnings or other administrative action.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-3423, as added by 1976, ch. 190, § 2, p. 688; am. 1990, ch. 269, § 3, p. 759; am. 1996, ch. 22, § 16, p. 41.

§ 22-3424. Review of action of director.

Any person who has exhausted all administrative remedies available within the department and who is aggrieved by a final decision in a contested case is entitled to judicial review in accordance with the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. The review may be obtained by filing in the district court within thirty (30) days’ notice of the action of the director, a written petition praying that such action be set aside. A copy of such petition shall forthwith be delivered to the director, and within thirty (30) days thereafter the director shall certify and file in the district court of the area affected a transcript of any record pertaining thereto, including a transcript of evidence received at any hearing of referendum. The district court shall give notice, by United States mail, to the director of the department of agriculture, and to the petitioner or petitioners, of the time and place at which the court will hear such petition, at which time any interested party may be heard. Upon completion of the hearing the court shall affirm, set aside or modify the action of the director, except that the findings of the director as to the facts, if supported by substantial evidence, shall be conclusive.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-3424, as added by 1976, ch. 190, § 2, p. 688; am. 1996, ch. 22, § 17, p. 41; am. 2001, ch. 183, § 4, p. 613.

§ 22-3425. Severability.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, or part of this act shall, for any reason, be adjudged by a competent court of jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which said judgment shall have been rendered.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-3425, as added by S.L. 1976, ch. 190, § 2, p. 688.

§ 22-3426. Uniformity of state pesticide rule.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no city, county, taxing district or other political subdivision of this state shall adopt or continue in effect any ordinance, rule, regulation, resolution or statute regarding pesticide sale, use, or application including without limitation: registration, notification of use, advertising and marketing, distribution, application methods, applicator training and certification, storage, transportation, disposal, disclosure of confidential information or product composition. Nothing contained in this section shall prohibit or limit fire prevention personnel or fire extinguishing personnel of a city, county or fire protection district from conducting inspections pursuant to or enforcing the International Fire Code.

History.

IC.,§ 22-3426, as added by 1994, ch. 102, § 1, p. 231; am. 1995, ch. 106, § 1, p. 339; am. 1996, ch. 22, § 18, p. 41; am. 2002, ch. 86, § 2, p. 195.